New Mexico, session 2026, HB158.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO:
SECTION 1. A new section of the Accountability in
Government Act is enacted to read:
"PROGRAMS AND PROJECTS FUNDED BY THE GOVERNMENT RESULTS
AND OPPORTUNITY PROGRAM FUND--ACCOUNTABILITY AND EVALUATION
PLANS.--
A. The division director and the director of the
committee shall develop instructions for agencies to submit
an accountability and evaluation plan for each program or
project that is funded by an appropriation from the
government results and opportunity program fund. An
accountability and evaluation plan shall, for each program or
project:
(1) identify the goals, objectives and
expected outputs and outcomes;
(2) describe the specific activities of the
program or project and how those activities will achieve HB 158/a
Page 1

expected outcomes;
(3) provide a summary of whether the program
or project is evidence-based, research-based, promising or
does not yet have rigorous research on its effectiveness;
(4) provide a list of performance measures
and a monitoring plan to regularly assess performance;
(5) provide an evaluation plan to assess the
causal impact on expected outcomes; and
(6) describe the methods and time line for
releasing accountability and evaluation results to the
division director, the director of the committee and the
public.
B. On or before May 1 of each year, the division
director shall notify each agency required to submit an
accountability and evaluation plan. The agency shall submit
the plan to the division director and the director of the
committee on or before July 1 of the year the appropriation
is made and, if the division director and the director of the
committee require, a revised plan on or before September 1 of
the same year.
C. On or before July 15 of the final year of an
appropriation for a program or project, the division director
and the director of the committee shall consider the
evaluation performed on the program or project and make
recommendations regarding inclusion of the program in the HB 158/a
Page 2

agency's budget for the following fiscal year." HB 158/a
Page 3